Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Chapter 5 Kinds of Insurance, Limits of Risk, Reinsurance

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of health or accident insurer to intervene in workers' compensation proceeding to recover benefits previously paid to claimant or beneficiary, 38 ALR4th 355.

Liability insurance: excess carrier's right of action against primary carrier for improper or inadequate defense of claim, 49 ALR4th 304.

“Excess” or “umbrella” insurance policy as providing coverage for accidents with uninsured or underinsured motorists, 2 ALR5th 922.

Requirement that multicoverage umbrella insurance policy offer uninsured- or underinsured-motorist coverage equal to liability limits under umbrella provisions, 52 ALR5th 451.

§ 26-5-101.
Definitions not mutually exclusive.

It is intended that certain insurance coverages may come within the definitions of two (2) or more kinds of insurance in this chapter, and the inclusion of a coverage within one (1) definition does not preclude it from being included within another definition in which it can be reasonably included.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 83; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-83; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-5-102.
“Life insurance” defined.

Life insurance is insurance on human lives and the transaction of life insurance includes also the granting of:

Endowment benefits;

Additional benefits because of death or dismemberment by accident or accidental means;

Additional benefits because of the insured’s disability; and

Optional modes of settlement of proceeds of life insurance.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 142, § 23; R.S. 1931, § 57-223; C.S. 1945, § 52-501; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-118, 26.1-84; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 84; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Accident or life insurance: death by autoerotic asphyxiation as accidental, 62 ALR4th 823.

Who is a “parent” entitled to proceeds of serviceman's group life insurance, where there are no named beneficiaries, and no surviving widow or children, under 38 USCS § 770(a), 73 ALR Fed 135.

§ 26-5-103.
“Disability insurance” defined.

Disability insurance is insurance of any kind on human beings against:

Bodily injury, disablement or death by accident or accidental means, or the expense thereof; or

Disablement or expense resulting from sickness.

For any statute with an effective date on or after July 2, 2011, and unless expressly and specifically provided by statute, the term “disability insurance” does not include any of the following excepted benefits:

Accident only insurance;

Accidental death or dismemberment insurance;

Credit insurance;

Dental or vision care insurance;

Medicare supplemental insurance as defined by section 1882(g)(i) of the federal Social Security Act;

Long-term care insurance, including nursing home fixed indemnity insurance, except if the commissioner determines that the insurance provides benefits so comprehensive that it is the equivalent of a health benefit plan and should not be exempt under this section;

Disability income or a combination of accident only and disability income insurance;

Insurance issued as a supplement to liability insurance;

Specified disease insurance;

Workers’ compensation insurance;

Medical payment insurance coverage provided under a motor vehicle insurance policy;

Hospital confinement indemnity insurance;

Limited benefit insurance that is offered and marketed as supplemental health insurance and not as a substitute for hospital or medical insurance or major medical expense insurance.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 85; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-85; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2011, ch. 165, § 1; 2019 ch. 189, § 3, effective April 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 125, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, added (b).

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 1, 2020, in (a)(ii), added "including subscription or membership plans relating to air ambulance transport services" at the end.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, deleted ", including subscription or membership plans relating to air ambulance transport services" at the end of (a)(ii).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2011, ch. 165 § 2 provides:

“The provisions of this act shall only apply prospectively to any individual or group disability insurance policy issued, delivered, issued for delivery or renewed in this state on or after July 1, 2011. Statutory provisions concerning the excepted benefits enumerated in W.S. 26-5-103(b) as amended in section 1 of this act which were enacted prior to July 2, 2011 shall remain applicable.”

Applicability.—

Laws 2019, ch. 189 § 6, provides: "This act applies to air ambulance transport services provided on or after April 1, 2020."

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Death during or after surgery as accidental within coverage of health or accident insurance policy, 91 ALR3d 1042.

Construction and application of provision in health or hospitalization policy excluding or postponing coverage of prior illness, 94 ALR3d 990.

Accident insurance: death or disability incident to partaking of food or drink as within provision as to external, violent and accidental means, 29 ALR4th 1230.

Accident insurance: what is “loss” of body member, 51 ALR4th 156.

Accident or life insurance: death by autoerotic asphyxiation as accidental, 62 ALR4th 823.

§ 26-5-104.
“Property insurance” defined.

Property insurance is insurance on any property against loss or damage from any cause, and against loss consequential upon that loss or damage, other than noncontractual legal liability for that loss or damage. Property insurance does not include title insurance, as defined in W.S.

26-5-109

.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 86; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-86; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability policy providing coverage for damages because of injury to or destruction of property as covering injury to investments, 92 ALR3d 525.

Livestock or animal insurance: risks and losses, 47 ALR4th 772.

Boiler and machinery insurance: risks and losses covered by policy or provision expressly covering boilers and machinery, 49 ALR4th 336.

Theft and vandalism insurance: coinsured's misconduct as barring innocent coinsured's right to recover on policy, 64 ALR4th 714.

Property damage insurance: what constitutes “contamination” within policy clause excluding coverage, 72 ALR4th 633.

What is “flood” within exclusionary clause of property damage policy, 78 ALR4th 817.

Construction and effect of provisional or monthly reporting inventory insurance, 81 ALR4th 9.

Liability policy coverage for insured's injury to third party's investments, anticipated profits, goodwill, or the like, unaccompanied by physical property damage, 18 ALR5th 187.

§ 26-5-105.
“Surety insurance” defined.

Surety insurance includes:

Fidelity insurance, which is insurance guaranteeing the fidelity of persons holding positions of public or private trust;

Insurance guaranteeing the performance of contracts, other than insurance policies, and guaranteeing and executing bonds, undertakings and contracts of suretyship;

Insurance indemnifying insureds against:

Loss, resulting from any cause, on bills of exchange, bonds, securities, deeds, warehouse receipts or other valuable papers, documents, money, precious metals and articles made therefrom, jewelry, watches, gems, precious and semiprecious stones, including any loss thereof while being transported in armored motor vehicles, or by messenger, but not including any other risks of transportation or navigation; or

Loss or damage to an insured’s premises or to his furnishings, fixtures, equipment, safes and vaults therein, caused by actual or attempted burglary, robbery, theft, vandalism or malicious mischief.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 87; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-87; Laws 1977, ch. 23, § 1; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Quoted

in

State Sur. Co. v. Lamb Constr. Co., 625 P.2d 184,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 291

(Wyo. 1981).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and effect of clause in fidelity bond or insurance policy excluding from coverage losses proved by “inventory computation” or “profit and loss computation,” 45 ALR4th 1049.

Construction and effect of “jeweler's block” policies or provisions contained therein, 22 ALR5th 579.

§ 26-5-106.
“Casualty insurance” defined.

Casualty insurance includes:

Insurance against:

Loss of or damage to any land vehicle or aircraft or any draft or riding animal or to property while contained therein or thereon or being loaded or unloaded therein or therefrom, from any cause;

Any loss, liability or expense resulting from or incidental to ownership, maintenance or use of any vehicle, aircraft or animal; and

Accidental injury to individuals, regardless of legal liability of the insured, including the named insured, while in, entering, alighting from, adjusting, repairing, cranking or caused by being struck by a vehicle, aircraft or draft or riding animal, if the insurance is issued as an incidental part of insurance on the vehicle, aircraft or draft or riding animal.

Insurance against legal liability for the death, injury, or disability of any human being or for damage to property, and provision of medical, hospital, surgical and disability benefits to injured persons and funeral and death benefits to dependents, beneficiaries or personal representatives of persons killed, regardless of legal liability of the insured, if issued as an incidental coverage with or supplemental to liability insurance;

Insurance of the obligations accepted by, imposed upon or assumed by employers under law for death, disablement or injury of employees;

Insurance against loss or damage:

By actual or attempted burglary, theft, robbery, forgery, fraud, vandalism, malicious mischief, confiscation, wrongful conversion, disposal or concealment, including supplemental coverage for medical, hospital, surgical and funeral expense incurred by the named insured or any other person as a result of bodily injury during the commission of a burglary, robbery or theft by another;

To monies, coins, bullion, securities, notes, drafts, acceptances or any other valuable papers and documents from any cause.

Insurance upon personal effects against loss or damage from any cause;

Insurance against loss or damage to glass, including its lettering, ornamentation and fittings;

Insurance against any liability and loss or damage to property or interest resulting from accidents to or explosions of boilers, pipes, pressure containers, machinery or apparatus, and the inspection of and issuance of certificates of inspection upon boilers, machinery and apparatus of any kind, whether or not insured;

Insurance against loss or damage to:

Any property or interest caused by the breakage or leakage of sprinklers, hoses, pumps and other fire extinguishing equipment or apparatus, water pipes or containers, or by water entering through leaks or openings in buildings; and

The sprinklers, hoses, pumps and other fire extinguishing equipment or apparatus.

Insurance indemnifying the insured against loss or damage resulting from failure of debtors to pay their obligations to the insured, including insurance to guarantee the repayment of real estate mortgages;

Insurance against:

Legal liability of the insured; and

Loss, damage, or expense incidental to a claim of that liability, including medical, hospital, surgical and funeral benefits to injured persons, regardless of legal liability of the insured, because of death, injury or disablement of any person or damage to the economic interests of any person as the result of negligence in rendering expert, fiduciary or professional service.

Insurance against loss of or damage to any property of the insured, resulting from the ownership, maintenance or use of elevators, except loss or damage by fire and including the inspection of and issuance of certificates of inspection upon elevators;

Insurance against congenital defects in human beings;

Insurance against loss or damage to livestock and services of a veterinary for those animals;

Insurance indemnifying the producer of any motion picture, television, radio, theatrical, sport, spectacle, entertainment or similar production, event or exhibition against loss from interruption, postponement or cancellation thereof because of death, accidental injury or sickness of performers, participants, directors or other principals;

Insurance against any other kind of loss, damage or liability properly a subject of insurance and not within any other kind of insurance as defined in this chapter, if the commissioner does not disapprove the insurance as being contrary to law or public policy.

Provision of medical, hospital, surgical and funeral benefits, and of coverage against accidental death or injury, as incidental to and part of other insurance as stated under paragraphs (a)(i), (ii), (iv), (vii), (x) and (xi) of this section is for all purposes the same kind of insurance to which it is so incidental and is not subject to provisions of this code [title 26] applicable to life or disability insurances.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 88; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-88; Laws 1977, ch. 23, § 1; 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2013 ch. 191, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

Cross references. —

For provisions as to consumer credit insurance, see §§

40-14-401

through

40-14-432

.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, deleted “larceny” after “theft” near the beginning of (a)(iv)(A).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Products liability insurance coverage as extending to particular losses, 91 ALR3d 921.

Who is “named insured” within meaning of automobile insurance coverage, 91 ALR3d 1280.

Farm owners' liability insurance risks and coverage, 93 ALR3d 472.

When is automobile “used under contract in behalf of, or loaned to,” insured, within meaning of “hired automobile” provision of automobile insurance policy, 5 ALR4th 636.

Liability to refund local taxes as within coverage of liability insurance, 21 ALR4th 895.

Insured's duties respecting care of injured or ill animal covered by animal or livestock policy, 22 ALR4th 1053.

Construction and application of pollution exclusion clause in liability insurance policy, 39 ALR4th 1047.

Construction and effect of clause in fidelity bond or insurance policy excluding from coverage losses proved by “inventory computation” or “profit and loss computation,” 45 ALR4th 1049.

Liability insurance: when is vehicle in “dead storage,” 48 ALR4th 591.

Aviation insurance: causal link between breach of policy provisions and accident as requisite to avoid insurer's liability, 48 ALR4th 778.

Boiler and machinery insurance: risks and losses covered by policy or provision expressly covering boilers and machinery, 49 ALR4th 336.

Accident insurance: what is “loss” of body member, 51 ALR4th 156.

Who is “employed or engaged in the automobile business” within exclusionary clause of liability policy, 55 ALR4th 261.

What constitutes use of vehicle “in the automobile business” within exclusionary clause of liability policy, 56 ALR4th 300.

What constitutes “entering” or “alighting from” vehicle within meaning of insurance policy, or statute mandating insurance coverage, 59 ALR4th 149.

Liability insurance: what is “claim” under deductibility-per-claim clause, 60 ALR4th 983.

What constitutes single accident or occurrence within liability policy limiting insurer's liability to a specified amount per accident or occurrence, 64 ALR4th 668.

Automobile insurance: umbrella or catastrophe policy automobile liability coverage as affected by primary policy “other insurance” clause, 67 ALR4th 14.

What constitutes theft within automobile theft insurance policy — modern cases, 67 ALR4th 82.

Construction and effect of “rain insurance” policies insuring against rainfall on the date of concert, exhibition, game or the like, 70 ALR4th 1010.

Validity and operation of “step-down” provision of automobile liability policy reducing coverage for permissive users, 29 ALR5th 469.

What constitutes “suit” triggering insurer's duty to defend environmental claims — state cases, 48 ALR5th 355.

What constitutes “vandalism” or “malicious mischief” within meaning of insurance policy specifically extending coverage to losses from such causes, 56 ALR5th 407.

§ 26-5-107.
“Marine and transportation insurance” and “wet marine and transportation insurance” defined.

“Marine and transportation insurance” includes:

Insurance against any kinds of loss or damage to:

Vessels, craft, aircraft vehicles of any kind, all cargoes, effects, disbursements, profits, monies, bullion, precious stones, securities, choses in action, evidences of debt, valuable papers, bottomry and respondentia interests and all other kinds of property and interests therein, incident thereto or in connection with any risks of any type of navigation, transit or transportation, or while being assembled or prepared in any manner for or awaiting shipment or during any delays, storage, transshipment or reshipment incident thereto, including marine builder’s risks and all personal property, floater risks; and

Person or to property in connection with or appertaining to a marine, inland marine, transit or transportation insurance, including liability for loss of or damage to either because of or in connection with the construction, repair, operation, maintenance or use of the subject matter of the insurance, excluding life insurance, surety bonds and insurance against loss by reason of bodily injury to the person because of the ownership, maintenance or use of automobiles; and

Any jewels or precious metals used in any manner and whether in transportation or otherwise; and

Bridges, tunnels and other instrumentalities of transportation, excluding buildings, their furnishings and fixed contents and supplies held in storage, unless fire, tornado, sprinkler leakage, hail, explosion, earthquake, riot or civil commotion or both, are the only hazards to be covered, piers, wharves, docks and slips, excluding the risks of fire, tornado, sprinkler leakage, hail, explosion, earthquake, riot or civil commotion or both, and other aids to navigation and transportation including dry docks and marine railways, against all risks; and

“Marine protection and indemnity insurance”, meaning insurance against the insured or against legal liability of the insured for, loss, damage or expense arising out of or incident to the ownership, operation, chartering, maintenance, use, repair or construction of any vessel or craft in use in ocean or inland waterways, including liability of the insured for personal injury, illness or death or for the loss of or damage to the property of another person.

For the purposes of this code [title 26], “wet marine and transportation” insurance is that part of “marine and transportation” insurance which includes only:

Insurance upon vessels, crafts, hulls and of interests therein or with relation thereto;

Insurance of marine builders’ risks, marine war risks and contracts of marine protection and indemnity insurance;

Insurance of freights and disbursements pertaining to a subject of insurance coming within this definition; and

Insurance of personal property and interests therein in course of exportation from or importation into any country, or in course of transportation coastwise or on inland waters, including any form of transportation from point of origin to final destination in respect to or in connection with any risks of navigation, transit or transportation, and while being prepared for or awaiting shipment, and during any delays, storage, transshipment or reshipment incident thereto.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 89; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-89; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Airport operations liability insurance, 92 ALR3d 1267.

Loss allegedly resulting from smuggling activities as within marine insurance policy covering barratry, 77 ALR Fed 743.

§ 26-5-108.
What insurance multiple line insurer may transact.

A multiple line insurer may transact any kind of insurance defined in this chapter, other than title insurance and, except as provided in W.S. 26-3-107(a)(i), life insurance or the granting of annuities.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 90; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-90; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-5-109.
“Title insurance” defined.

Title insurance is insurance of owners of property or others having an interest therein, or liens or encumbrances thereon, against loss by encumbrance, defective titles, invalidity or adverse claim to title.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 91; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-91; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction of clause in title insurance policy excepting defects resulting from the rights of parties in possession, 94 ALR3d 1188.

§ 26-5-110.
Limit of risk.

No insurer, other than a title insurer, shall retain any risk on any one (1) subject of insurance, regardless of where located or to be performed, in an amount exceeding ten percent (10%) of its surplus to policyholders.

A “subject of insurance” for the purposes of this section, as to insurance against fire and hazards other than windstorm, earthquake and other catastrophic hazards, includes all properties insured by the same insurer which are customarily considered by underwriters to be subject to loss or damage from the same fire or the same occurrence of any other hazard insured against.

Reinsurance ceded as authorized by W.S.

26-5-111

shall be deducted in determining risk retained. As to surety risks, the amount assumed by any established incorporated cosurety and the value of any security deposited, pledged or held subject to the surety’s consent and for the surety’s protection shall also be deducted.

As to alien insurers, this section relates only to risks and surplus to policyholders of the insurer’s United States branch.

“Surplus to policyholders” for the purposes of this section, in addition to the insurer’s capital and surplus, includes any voluntary reserves which are not required pursuant to law and shall be determined from the insurer’s last sworn statement on file with the commissioner, or by the last report of examination of the insurer, whichever is the more recent at time of assumption of risk.

This section does not apply to life or disability insurance, annuities, insurance of wet marine and transportation risks, worker’s compensation insurance, employers’ liability coverages nor to any policy or type of coverage as to which the maximum possible loss to the insurer is not readily ascertainable on issuance of the policy.

Limits of risk as to newly formed domestic mutual insurers shall be as provided in W.S.

26-24-109

.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 231, § 5; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-56, 26.1-92; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 92; 1983, ch. 188, § 2; ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-5-111.
Reinsurance.

through (e) Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 128, § 2.

An insurer may accept reinsurance only on the risks and within the limits authorized.

through (n) Repealed by Laws 1992, ch. 59, § 3.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 142, § 8; R.S. 1931, § 57-208; C.S. 1945, § 52-308; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-68, 26.1-93; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 93; 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1991, ch. 128 §§ 1, 2; 1992, ch. 59, § 3.

Cross references. —

For additional provisions relating to reinsurance, see §§

26-5-112

through

26-5-119

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Reinsurer's liability for primary liability insurer's failure to compromise or settle, 42 ALR4th 1130.